Illinois, session 104th, HB3240.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title; references to Act. This Act may be 5cited as the Mobile Panic Alert System Act. This Act may be 6referred to as Alyssa's Law. 7    Section 5. Mobile panic alert system.8    (a) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public 9school, including a charter school, shall implement a mobile 10panic alert system capable of connecting diverse emergency 11services technologies to ensure real-time coordination between 12multiple first responder agencies. Such system, to be known as 13"Alyssa's Alert", must integrate with local public safety 14answering point infrastructure to transmit 9-1-1 calls and 15mobile activations.16    (b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a 17school district may implement additional strategies or systems 18to ensure real-time coordination between multiple first 19responder agencies in a school security emergency.20    (c) For the 2026 fiscal year, the State Board of Education 21shall issue a competitive solicitation to contract for a 22mobile panic alert system that may be used by each school 23district. The State Board shall consult with the Illinois   HB3240- 2 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1State Police and the Illinois Emergency Management Agency in 2the development of the competitive solicitation for the mobile 3panic alert system. 4    Section 10. Mobile Panic Alert System Grant Program. 5    (a) Subject to appropriation, the State Board of Education 6shall establish and administer a Mobile Panic Alert System 7Grant Program for the purpose of issuing grants to reimburse 8school districts for the cost of the mobile panic alert 9systems described in subsection (a) of Section 5. Grants shall 10be awarded from moneys appropriated for that purpose from the 11Mobile Panic Alert System Grant Fund.12    (b) The Mobile Panic Alert System Grant Fund is created as 13a special fund in the State treasury. All money in the Mobile 14Panic Alert System Grant Fund shall be used, subject to 15appropriation, by the State Board of Education for the Mobile 16Panic Alert System Grant Program. 17    Section 85. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 18Section 5.1030 as follows: 19    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)20    Sec. 5.1030. The Mobile Panic Alert System Grant Fund. 21    Section 90. The School Code is amended by changing Section 2227A-5 as follows:   HB3240- 3 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1    (105 ILCS 5/27A-5)2    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)3    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 4    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 5nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 6school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 7corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 8authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.9    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 10by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 11school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 12new applications to establish a charter school in a city 13having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 14charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 15does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 16before April 16, 2003.17    (b-5) (Blank). 18    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 19its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 20provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 21school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 22the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 23or other governing body must include at least one parent or 24guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 25who may be selected through the charter school or a charter   HB3240- 4 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 2directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 3Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 4    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 5year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 6school's board of directors or other governing body shall 7complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 8leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 9familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 10responsibilities, including financial oversight and 11accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 12school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 13Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 14and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 15voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 16other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 17professional development training in these same areas. The 18training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 19a statewide charter school membership association or may be 20provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 21the State Board. 22    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 23health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 24requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 25preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 26students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or   HB3240- 5 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 2school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 3requirement" does not include any course of study or 4specialized instructional requirement for which the State 5Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 6designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 7to master and apply as an outcome of their education.8    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 9health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 10under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 11promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 12non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 13school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 14than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 15school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 16requires the charter school to follow the list of all 17non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 18the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 19requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 20term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 21an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 22requirements in a charter school contract that are not 23contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 24including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 25authorizing local school board. 26    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a   HB3240- 6 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 2charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 3instructional materials, and student activities.4    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 5management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 6not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 7charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 8outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 9school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 10school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 11in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 12To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 13funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 14charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 15Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 16charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 17Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 18financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 19require quarterly financial statements from each charter 20school. 21    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 22this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 23all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 24schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 25of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 26exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code   HB3240- 7 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1governing public schools and local school board policies; 2however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:3        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 4    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 5    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 6    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 7    for employment;8        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 9    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;10        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 11    Tort Immunity Act;12        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 13    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 14    officers, directors, employees, and agents;15        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;16        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 17    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;18        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;19        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 20    report cards;21        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;22        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 23    prevention;24        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 25    discipline reporting;26        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;  HB3240- 8 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;2        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;3        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;4        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 5        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;6        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;7        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;8        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;9        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;10        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;11        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 12        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code;13        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;14        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 15        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 16    10-20.56 of this Code; 17        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 18        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 19        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 20        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;21        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code;22        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 23        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 24        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;25        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and26        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code; and .  HB3240- 9 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1        (38) the Mobile Panic Alert System Act. 2    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 3(g) is declaratory of existing law.4    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 5school district, the governing body of a State college or 6university or public community college, or any other public or 7for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 8school building and grounds or any other real property or 9facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 10for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 11maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 12activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 13to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 14Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 15district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 16use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 17services for which a charter school contracts with a school 18district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 19services for which a charter school contracts with a local 20school board or with the governing body of a State college or 21university or public community college shall be provided by 22the public entity at cost.23    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 24by converting an existing school or attendance center to 25charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 26deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter   HB3240- 10 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 2costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 3facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 4subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 5local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.6    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 7or grade level.8    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 9Board, then the charter school is its own local education 10agency. 11(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 12102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-522, eff. 138-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 14102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 102-805, eff. 151-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, 16eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 17103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-9-24.) 18    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)19    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 20    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 21nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 22school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 23corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 24authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.25    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article   HB3240- 11 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 2school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 3new applications to establish a charter school in a city 4having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 5charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 6does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 7before April 16, 2003.8    (b-5) (Blank). 9    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 10its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 11provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 12school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 13the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 14or other governing body must include at least one parent or 15guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 16who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 17network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 18directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 19Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 20    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 21year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 22school's board of directors or other governing body shall 23complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 24leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 25familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 26responsibilities, including financial oversight and   HB3240- 12 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 2school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 3Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 4and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 5voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 6other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 7professional development training in these same areas. The 8training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 9a statewide charter school membership association or may be 10provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 11the State Board. 12    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 13health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 14requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 15preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 16students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 17prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 18school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 19requirement" does not include any course of study or 20specialized instructional requirement for which the State 21Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 22designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 23to master and apply as an outcome of their education.24    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 25health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 26under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall   HB3240- 13 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 2non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 3school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 4than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 5school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 6requires the charter school to follow the list of all 7non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 8the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 9requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 10term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 11an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 12requirements in a charter school contract that are not 13contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 14including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 15authorizing local school board. 16    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 17charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 18charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 19instructional materials, and student activities.20    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 21management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 22not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 23charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 24outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 25school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 26school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer   HB3240- 14 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 2To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 3funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 4charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 5Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 6charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 7Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 8financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 9require quarterly financial statements from each charter 10school. 11    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 12this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 13all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 14schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 15of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 16exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 17governing public schools and local school board policies; 18however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:19        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 20    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 21    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 22    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 23    for employment;24        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 25    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;26        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees   HB3240- 15 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1    Tort Immunity Act;2        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 3    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 4    officers, directors, employees, and agents;5        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;6        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 7    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;8        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;9        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 10    report cards;11        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;12        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 13    prevention;14        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 15    discipline reporting;16        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;17        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;18        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;19        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;20        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 21        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;22        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;23        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;24        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;25        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;26        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;  HB3240- 16 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 2        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code; 3        (24) Article 26A of this Code;4        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;5        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 6        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 7    10-20.56 of this Code; 8        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 9        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 10        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 11        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;12        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code; 13        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 14        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 15        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;16        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and17        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code; and .18        (38) the Mobile Panic Alert System Act. 19    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 20(g) is declaratory of existing law.21    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 22school district, the governing body of a State college or 23university or public community college, or any other public or 24for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 25school building and grounds or any other real property or 26facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert   HB3240- 17 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 2maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 3activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 4to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 5Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 6district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 7use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 8services for which a charter school contracts with a school 9district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 10services for which a charter school contracts with a local 11school board or with the governing body of a State college or 12university or public community college shall be provided by 13the public entity at cost.14    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 15by converting an existing school or attendance center to 16charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 17deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 18agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 19costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 20facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 21subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 22local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.23    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 24or grade level.25    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 26Board, then the charter school is its own local education   HB3240- 18 -LRB104 08287 LNS 18338 b1agency. 2(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 3102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-466, eff. 47-1-25; 102-522, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, 5eff. 12-3-21; 102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 6102-805, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 76-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, 8eff. 7-1-24; 103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; 9revised 11-26-24.) 10    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 11changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 12that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 13represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 14not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 15made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 16Public Act. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 181, 2026.